New York, session 2025-2026, S8962.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Nassau is hereby authorized to accept from 3 Telugu Literary and Cultural Association, an application for exemption 4 from real property taxes pursuant to section 420-a of the real property 5 tax law with respect to the 2024-2025 assessment roll for all of the 6 2024-2025 school taxes and all of the 2025 general taxes and with 7 respect to the 2025-2026 assessment roll a portion of the 2025-2026 8 school taxes and all of the 2026 general taxes for the parcel conveyed 9 to such organization being located at 1 North Village Green, hamlet of 10 Levittown, town of Hempstead, county of Nassau, otherwise known as 11 Nassau county parcel ID section 45, block 158, lot 19. If accepted, the 12 application shall be reviewed as if it had been received on or before 13 the taxable status dates established for such rolls. 14 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 15 such exemption if such organization had acquired the subject property 16 and filed an application for exemption by the appropriate taxable status 17 date, the assessor, upon approval by the Nassau county legislature, may 18 grant exemption from all taxation and make appropriate corrections to 19 the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such organization 20 therefore shall have paid any tax with respect to the subject rolls, the 21 governing body or tax department may, in its sole discretion, provide 22 for the refund of those taxes paid and cancel any taxes, fines, penal- 23 ties, interest or tax liens remaining unpaid. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14358-01-6